Tennessee, session 114, HB1671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 51, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
7-51-2801.
A local governmental entity shall not relocate a homeless individual to another
jurisdiction, unless the local governmental entity receives written consent for such
relocation from the receiving jurisdiction.
7-51-2802.
A local governmental entity shall not use public funds to relocate homeless
individuals to other jurisdictions, unless the local governmental entity verifies that
housing and other necessary services are available for the homeless individuals in the
receiving jurisdiction.
7-51-2803.
(a) The attorney general and reporter may seek civil penalties of up to ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) from a local governmental entity for each violation of § 7-51-
2801 or § 7-51-2802.
(b) A jurisdiction that is affected by a violation of § 7-51-2801 or § 7-51-2802
may seek damages and injunctive relief against the local governmental entity.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1671
009919
- 1 -